Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-4111
Tax Commissioner; rules and regulations.

The Tax Commissioner may adopt and promulgate all rules and regulations necessary to carry out the purposes of the Employment and Investment Growth Act.

Laws 1988, LB 1234, § 9;

Laws 2019, LB512, § 28.